District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-5206

Penalties

Repealed.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(ss)-(uu), 29 DCR 3976

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-3404 to 22-3406.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-3407, 22-3408.